Hawaii, session 2026, HB1271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $65,829,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the eleventh representative district, as follows: 1.   Kihei library floodzone managed retreat, Maui Plans for moving the State library out of the flood zone. Plans                          $200,000 Total funding                       $200,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services. 2.   R-1 water reservoir, Maui Plans, design, and construction for a South Maui R-1 water reservoir; requires a 1:1 match by the county of Maui and is important for housing and greening mauka for fire threat mitigation. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                $18,000,000 Total funding                    $20,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services. 3.   Kamali elementary school, Maui Plans, design, and construction for new heating ventilation and air conditioning system. Plans                           $50,000 Design                          $50,000 Construction                 $2,400,000 Total funding                     $2,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 4.   Kamali elementary, Maui Design and construction for the roofing of building C. Design                          $50,000 Construction                   $300,000 Total funding                       $350,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 5.   Kihei elementary school, Maui Plans, design, and construction for a special education classroom building. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                $16,000,000 Total funding                    $18,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 6.   Kulanihakoi high school, Maui Plans for basic kitchen equipment, including a tilt skillet braising system and related items to allow for cooking local food. Plans                           $35,000 Total funding                        $35,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 7.   Kulanihakoi high school, Maui Plans, design, and construction for ADA compliant grade-separated crossings required by the land use commission. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                $18,000,000 Total funding                    $20,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 8.   Kahoolawe island reserve commission educational center, Maui Plans, design, and construction for updating community planning and museum exhibitions, and for boat house upgrades. Plans                          $350,000 Design                       $3,000,000 Construction                   $900,000 Total funding                     $4,250,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 9.   Rock wall repairs and storm mitigation, Maui Construction for rockwall repairs and storm mitigation at TMK 3-9-001-012-0000. Construction                   $294,000 Total funding                       $294,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 10.  Kihei bike pass, Maui Plans for for Kihei bypass from Maui meadows to Kulanihakoi school area, to function as fire emergency egress and traffic issue mitigation. Plans                          $200,000 Total funding                       $200,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________